Maryland, session 2026, HB1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
TITLE 7.5. TEMPORARY WORKERS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1543*

HOUSE BILL 1543
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.
7.5–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(C) “EMPLOYER” MEANS A PERSON THAT EMPLOYS OR SPONSORS A
TEMPORARY WORKER IN THE STATE.
(D) “RECRUITER” MEANS A PERSON THAT RECRUITS, SOLICITS, HIRES,
REFERS, OR TRANSPORTS A TEMPORARY WORKER.
(E) “TEMPORARY WORKER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED IN THE
STATE UNDER AN H–2A OR H–2B VISA.
(F) “UNIT” MEANS THE TEMPORARY WORKER OVERSIGHT UNIT.
7.5–102.
IF TITLE 7 OF THIS ARTICLE CONFLICTS WITH THIS TITLE, THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS TITLE SHALL PREVAIL.
SUBTITLE 2. TEMPORARY WORKER OVERSIGHT UNIT.
7.5–201.
THERE IS A TEMPORARY WORKER OVERSIGHT UNIT IN THE DEPARTMENT.
7.5–202.
THE UNIT SHALL:
(1) COORDINATE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS TITLE;
(2) COLLECT DATA REGARDING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(3) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, SUBMIT A REPORT TO
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE

HOUSE BILL 1543 3
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THAT INCLUDES FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR:
(I) THE ACTIONS OF THE UNIT TAKEN UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SECTION;
(II) THE DATA COLLECTED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(III) ANY OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION RELATED TO THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS TITLE.
7.5–203.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ENSURE THAT A TEMPORARY WORKER IS ALLOWED TO:
(I) FILE COMPLAINTS WITH THE DEPARTMENT REGARDING
VIOLATIONS OF THIS TITLE; AND
(II) COMMUNICATE WITH DEPARTMENT INVESTIGATORS;
(2) PROVIDE ANY COMPLAINT FORMS, INFORMATIONAL FORMS, AND
COMMUNICATIONS RELATED TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS TITLE IN ENGLISH AND
SPANISH; AND
(3) ON REQUEST, PROVIDE QUALIFIED SPANISH INTERPRETATION
SERVICES TO TEMPORARY WORKERS FOR INTERVIEWS, INVESTIGATIONS, AND
COMPLAINT PROCEEDINGS RELATED TO ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS TITLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(1) CONDUCT UNANNOUNCED INSPECTIONS OF WORK SITES AND
EMPLOYER–PROVIDED HOUSING FOR TEMPORARY WORKERS; AND
(2) EXAMINE PAYROLL RECORDS, HOUSING CONDITIONS,
TRANSPORTATION ARRANGEMENTS, AND SAFETY COMPLIANCE.
SUBTITLE 3. RECRUITMENT AND EMPLOYMENT OF TEMPORARY WORKERS.
7.5–301.

HOUSE BILL 1543
A RECRUITER THAT OPERATES IN THE STATE SHALL:
(1) REGISTER WITH THE DEPARTMENT ANNUALLY ON A FORM THAT
THE DEPARTMENT REQUIRES; AND
(2) POST A SURETY BOND WITH THE DEPARTMENT FOR NOT LESS
THAN $10,000.
7.5–302.
(A) AN EMPLOYER OR A RECRUITER MAY NOT:
(1) CHARGE, COLLECT, OR CAUSE TO BE CHARGED OR COLLECTED, A
RECRUITMENT FEE, A PROMISSORY NOTE, A LOAN, OR ANY OTHER OBLIGATION
FROM A TEMPORARY WORKER;
(2) RETALIATE AGAINST A TEMPORARY WORKER FOR TAKING AN
ACTION AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE;
(3) INTERFERE WITH, BY INTIMIDATION OR OTHERWISE, THE
PROVISION OF SERVICES UNDER § 7.5–303(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(4) PREVENT A SERVICE PROVIDER INVITED BY A TEMPORARY
WORKER FROM ENTERING THE EMPLOYER–PROVIDED HOUSING.
(B) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT EMPLOY A TEMPORARY WORKER BEFORE
FILING AN AFFIDAVIT STATING THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS NOT VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO THE TEMPORARY WORKER
ON A FORM REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) AN ADVERSE ACTION TAKEN AGAINST A TEMPORARY WORKER WITHIN
90 DAYS AFTER A COMPLAINT OR ACTION IS FILED UNDER § 7.5–401 OF THIS TITLE
CREATES A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
7.5–303.
(A) A TEMPORARY WORKER MAY ALLOW A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE
FOLLOWING ORGANIZATIONS TO ENTER THE EMPLOYER–PROVIDED HOUSING:
(1) A FARM WORKER ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION;
(2) A LEGAL SERVICES ORGANIZATION;

HOUSE BILL 1543 5
(3) AN OUTREACH ORGANIZATION;
(4) A HEALTH SERVICE ORGANIZATION;
(5) A LABOR ORGANIZATION; AND
(6) ANY OTHER ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES SERVICES TO
TEMPORARY WORKERS.
(B) REPRESENTATIVES ALLOWED TO ENTER EMPLOYER–PROVIDED
HOUSING UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY:
(1) PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO TEMPORARY WORKERS CONSISTENT
WITH THE MISSION OF THE ORGANIZATION;
(2) SUPPORT THE TEMPORARY WORKERS IN FILING COMPLAINTS AND
ACTIONS UNDER § 7.5–401 OF THIS TITLE AND PURSUING RESOLUTIONS TO THE
ACTIONS AND COMPLAINTS; AND
(3) PROVIDE EDUCATION TO TEMPORARY WORKERS.
SUBTITLE 4. ENFORCEMENT.
7.5–401.
(A) IF AN EMPLOYER OR A RECRUITER VIOLATES THIS TITLE, A TEMPORARY
WORKER MAY:
(1) FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(2) BRING AN ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(B) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES AN EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED
THIS TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY NOT TO EXCEED
$10,000.
(2) FOR A VIOLATION INVOLVING MORE THAN ONE TEMPORARY
WORKER, EACH AFFECTED TEMPORARY WORKER CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE
VIOLATION.
(C) IN AN ACTION FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION:

HOUSE BILL 1543
(1) THE TEMPORARY WORKER MAY SEEK TREBLE DAMAGES AND
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(2) THE COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE FEES AND COSTS,
INCLUDING ATTORNEY’S FEES AND EXPERT WITNESS FEES, TO THE PREVAILING
PLAINTIFF.
(D) AN EMPLOYER AND A RECRUITER ARE JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY LIABLE
FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE COMMITTED BY A RECRUITER ACTING ON BEHALF
OF THE EMPLOYER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.